Utah statutes.
77-28c-104.   Definitions -- Compact transfer application fee.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Department" means the Department of Corrections.

(b)  "Offender" has the same meaning as provided in Section 77-28c-103, Article II(a)(9).

(2) (a)  Offenders desiring a transfer of supervision to another state under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision shall apply to the department for transfer.

(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules governing the transfer of supervision of an offender.

(3)  The department shall collect a fee of $50 from each offender applying for transfer of supervision to another state under the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

